Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5335YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2315 Section 1. Section 232.142, subsection 6, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Moneys deposited in the juvenile detention home 3 fund during a fiscal year are appropriated to the department 4 for the same fiscal year for distribution of an amount equal to 5 a percentage of the costs of the establishment, improvement, 6 operation, and maintenance of county or multicounty juvenile 7 detention homes in the prior immediately preceding fiscal year. 8 Such percentage shall be determined by the department based on 9 the amount available for distribution from the fund. 10 (2) Moneys appropriated for distribution in accordance with 11 this subsection shall be allocated among eligible detention 12 homes, as follows: 13 (a) One hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be distributed 14 to each eligible county or multicounty juvenile detention home. 15 (b) Appropriated moneys remaining after the distribution 16 in subparagraph division (a) shall be prorated and distributed 17 on the basis of an eligible county or multicounty juvenile 18 detention homeâs proportion of the costs of all eligible 19 county or multicounty juvenile detention homes in the prior 20 immediately preceding fiscal year. 21